Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
ARTICLE 44
ESTRAYS

Law reviews:

For article, "

C

olorado's Fence Law: An Overview of Open Range and Fence Out

C

oncepts", see 43 Colo. Law. 29 (March 2014).

Section

35-44-101. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Estray" means any bovine animal, horse, mule, ass, or alternative livestock as defined in section 35-41.5-102 (1) found running at large upon public or private lands in the state of Colorado whose owner is either known or unknown in the section where found or which is outside the limits of its usual range or pasture. It is unlawful for any person, corporation, or company, or any of its employees or agents, to take into its custody any such estray and retain possession of the same, except as provided in this article.

Source:

L. 03:

p. 215, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 6426.

C.L.

§ 3230.

CSA:

C. 160, § 147.

CRS 53:

§ 8-4-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-4-1.

L. 69:

p. 123, § 1.

L. 94:

(1) amended, p. 1710, § 8, effective July 1.

35-44-102. Taking up estrays - notice.

No person shall take into his custody an estray animal unless the same is found trespassing upon lands owned, leased, or otherwise controlled by him. The state board of stock inspection commissioners or an authorized brand inspector representing said board has authority to move such estray animal to a safe and practical place within the immediate vicinity to be held during the legal advertising period. When any person takes into his custody an estray, within five days thereafter he shall make out a written description of such animal, setting forth all marks or brands appearing upon such animal and other marks of identity, such as color, age, size, sex, and possible owner, and forward the same by mail to the state board of stock inspection commissioners in Denver or notify the nearest authorized brand inspector. Any person having knowledge of any estray animal upon the public range may notify the state board of stock inspection commissioners, or any authorized brand inspector of said board, giving a description of said estray, and upon instructions from the board of stock inspection commissioners, or from an authorized inspector of the board, said estray shall be held by such person to be turned over to a duly authorized inspector of said board for disposition as the board may direct according to law.

Source:

L. 03:

p. 215, § 2.

R.S. 08:

§ 6427.

C.L.

§ 3231.

CSA:

C. 160, § 148.

CRS 53:

§ 8-4-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-4-2.

L. 69:

p. 123, § 2.

35-44-103. When estray returned to owner.

Upon receiving notice that any person has taken into his custody any estray animal, it is the duty of the state board of stock inspection commissioners to make or cause to be made an examination of the state brand records, and if from this record the name of the owner or probable owner can be determined, it shall forthwith notify him of the taking into custody of such estray. Upon the owner proving to the satisfaction of the state board of stock inspection commissioners that the estray animal is rightfully his, the state board shall issue to him an order to receive the same upon payment of any reasonable charges which may have been incurred in the care of said animal.

Source:

L. 03:

p. 216, § 3.

R.S. 08:

§ 6428.

C.L.

§ 3232.

CSA:

C. 160, § 149.

CRS 53:

§ 8-4-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-4-3.

35-44-104. Owner not found - advertisement.

If the brand commissioner appointed by the state board of stock inspection commissioners is unable to determine from the brand records and description who is the owner or probable owner of any reported estrays, he shall cause notice showing a facsimile of the brand and other identifying characteristics carried by the estray to be posted in the offices of all county clerk and recorders, and licensed livestock markets and in other conspicuous places in the area where said estray was found. Said livestock notice shall state when and where the estray animal was taken into custody. In addition the brand commissioner shall cause a notice giving a general description of the estray to be placed in a local newspaper within the county where the estray is held, and said notice shall be carried in one regular issue only. Both notices shall state that unless the animal is claimed by the legal owner within ten days after the publication or posting of the notice, whichever is later, then the same shall be sold by the state board of stock inspection commissioners for the benefit of the owner when found.

Source:

L. 03:

p. 216, § 4.

R.S. 08:

§ 6429.

L. 17:

p. 222, § 1.

C.L.

§ 3233.

CSA:

C. 160, § 150.

L. 53:

p. 579, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 8-4-4.

L. 63:

p. 185, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-4-4.

35-44-105. Sale of estrays.

If said estray animal is not claimed within ten days after the posting of estray notice, it shall be sold by the state board of stock inspection commissioners, through an authorized brand inspector of the board, in such manner as the board may direct. It is the duty of the brand inspector making such sale to give a bill of sale to the purchaser from the state board of stock inspection commissioners, signed by himself as inspector for the board, which bill of sale shall be legal evidence of the ownership of said animal by the purchaser thereof and shall be a legal and valid title to said animal.

Source:

L. 03:

p. 217, § 5.

R.S. 08:

§ 6430.

C.L.

§ 3234.

CSA:

C. 160, § 151.

CRS 53:

§ 8-4-5.

L. 63:

p. 185, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-4-5.

35-44-106. Proceeds of sale - rules.

The brand inspector making the sale of such estray shall return the proceeds of such sale to the state board of stock inspection commissioners, who shall pay the expenses incurred in taking into custody, holding, advertising, and selling such animal, and place the balance in the estray fund of said board, making a record of the same, showing the marks and brands and other means of identification of said animal, and giving the amount realized from the sale of same, which record shall be open to the inspection of the public. Should the owner of any estray that has been sold be found within three years after the sale of such animal, the net amount received from the sale of said estray, less a sum determined by the board by rule, for each estray, to be retained by the board, shall be paid to said owner upon the owner proving ownership to the satisfaction of the board.

Source:

L. 03:

p. 217, § 6.

R.S. 08:

§ 6431.

C.L.

§ 3235.

CSA:

C. 160, § 152.

CRS 53:

§ 8-4-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-4-6.

L. 79:

Entire section amended, p. 1333, § 2, effective May 18.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 649, § 9, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the estray fund, see § 35-41-102.

35-44-107. Custody of estray - claimant.

When any person takes into his custody any estray animal and sends a description of the same to the state board of stock inspection commissioners, said person shall be entitled to hold same lawfully until relieved of its custody by the state board of stock inspection commissioners. Should a claimant for said animal apply to the person who has custody of the estray for possession of the same, the said person shall at once notify the state board of stock inspection commissioners in writing of such application, and should the said board be satisfied that said applicant is the rightful owner, it shall forthwith issue an order authorizing said person in custody to deliver the estray to the owner, who may be required to pay any reasonable charges made by said person in custody. In case of a controversy as to what constitutes a reasonable charge, the state board of stock inspection commissioners shall fix the amount. The time of service for which said person may claim remuneration commences upon the date of notification made by the said person to the state board of stock inspection commissioners.

Source:

L. 03:

p. 218, § 7.

R.S. 08:

§ 6432.

C.L.

§ 3236.

CSA:

C. 160, § 153.

CRS 53:

§ 8-4-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-4-7.

35-44-108. Who may take up estrays.

It is unlawful for any person other than an authorized inspector of the state board of stock inspection commissioners to take into custody or retain possession of any estray, except as provided in section 35-44-107. Any person who takes into custody and retains possession of any estray without notifying the state board of stock inspection commissioners within the time as provided in this article is guilty of a class 6 felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-401, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 03:

p. 218, § 8.

R.S. 08:

§ 6433.

C.L.

§ 3237.

CSA:

C. 160, § 154.

CRS 53:

§ 8-4-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-4-8.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 409, § 20, effective June 6.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1550, § 323, effective October 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

35-44-109. Official state livestock paper.

It is the duty of the state board of stock inspection commissioners to designate a livestock newspaper, of general circulation among the cattle and horse owners of the state, as the official state livestock paper, wherein all estray notices and advertisements of estrays may be legally made. In case of a change being made in the selection of such paper, the paper then publishing these notices shall publish a notice of said change for at least thirty days.

Source:

L. 03:

p. 218, § 9.

R.S. 08:

§ 6434.

C.L.

§ 3238.

CSA:

C. 160, § 155.

CRS 53:

§ 8-4-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-4-9.

Cross references:

For additional provisions concerning the state livestock paper, see §§ 35-43-113 and 35-50-109.

35-44-110. Application as to municipalities.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to repeal any of the laws now in effect in regard to the impounding of estray animals by municipalities.

Source:

L. 03:

p. 219, § 10.

R.S. 08:

§ 6435.

C.L.

§ 3239.

CSA:

C. 160, § 156.

CRS 53:

§ 8-4-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-4-10.

35-44-111. Concealing estray - penalty.

Any person who conceals any estray found or taken into his or her custody, or effaces or changes any mark or brand thereon, or carries the same beyond the limits of the county where found, or knowingly permits the same to be done, or neglects to notify or give information of estrays to the state board of stock inspection commissioners is guilty of a class 6 felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-401, C.R.S.

Source:

G.L.

§ 2567.

G.S.

§ 1306.

R.S. 08:

§ 6444.

C.L.

§ 3241.

CSA:

C. 160, § 158.

CRS 53:

§ 8-4-11.

L. 63:

p. 322, § 5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-4-11.

L. 67:

p. 574, § 2.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 409, § 21, effective June 6.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1550, § 324, effective October 1.

Cross references:

(1) For provisions relative to effacing brands, see § 35-43-116.

(2) For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

35-44-112. Abandoned livestock.

The state board of stock inspection commissioners shall have the charge and control of all livestock abandoned or neglected by the owners thereof, and any officer or agent of the state board of stock inspection commissioners may take charge of any such stock or animals found abandoned or neglected.

The state board of stock inspection commissioners, upon taking charge of any such stock or animals, shall forthwith give notice to the owners thereof, if known, and shall care and provide for such stock or animals for a period of ten days from and after the mailing or giving of such notice to the owners of said animals or until the owners take charge of the same within said ten days. The expense of such care and provision shall be a lien upon such stock or animals and shall be paid by the owners to the said state board of stock inspection commissioners before the owners shall be entitled to the possession of the animals.

Upon the owner's failure to pay said expense charges, said stock or animals or such a number thereof as may be necessary shall be sold to the best advantage by the state board of stock inspection commissioners in its discretion at public or private sale, and the proceeds of such sale shall be paid to the owners, after all expenses incurred for the care and provision of said animals and all costs of said sale are deducted. The purchaser at such sale shall be entitled to a bill of sale from the state board of stock inspection commissioners, by virtue of which the purchaser shall acquire a good and valid title; but no sale shall be made previous to the expiration of ten days from and after the date of said notice to the owners.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 594, § 1.

C.L.

§ 3222.

CSA:

C. 160, § 139.

CRS 53:

§ 8-4-12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-4-12.

L. 69:

p. 124, § 3.

35-44-113. Publication of notice - sale - rules.

If the owners of any animals or livestock found abandoned or neglected, as provided for in section 35-44-112, are unknown to the state board of stock inspection commissioners, its officers, or agents, the notice required by section 35-44-112 shall be given by publishing the same as provided for in the case of animals or livestock taken up as estrays. If the owner is not found in ten days after the date of the first publication of the notice, the animals or livestock may be sold. The proceeds, after deducting all expenses of such care, provision, and sale, less a sum determined by the board by rule, for each animal sold, to be retained by the board, shall be credited to the estray fund of the board, subject to the provisions of the law controlling the distribution of the fund. The amount determined by the board retained for each animal sold shall be credited to the brand inspection fund, subject to the provisions of the law controlling the distribution of the brand inspection fund.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 595, § 2.

C.L.

§ 3223.

CSA:

C. 160, § 140.

CRS 53:

§ 8-4-13.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-4-13.

L. 69:

p. 124, § 4.

L. 79:

Entire section amended, p. 1333, § 3, effective May 18.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 649, § 10, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the brand inspection fund, see § 35-41-102.

35-44-114. Disputed ownership - animal deemed not alternative livestock.

In any instance where the board determines that an animal is not an alternative livestock, any dispute as to ownership shall be decided by the parks and wildlife commission created in section 33-9-101, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire section added, p. 1710, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

Entire section amended, (HB 12-1317), ch. 248, p. 1238, § 101, effective June 4.